Utah statutes.
10-8-53.   Fire escapes -- Construction -- Building exits -- Fire
extinguishers.
They may prescribe the manner of constructing stone, brick and other
buildings, and the construction and maintenance of fire escapes; may cause all
buildings used for public purposes to be provided with sufficient and ample
means of exit and entrance, and to be supplied with necessary and appropriate
appliances for the extinguishment of fire; may prevent the overcrowding
thereof, and regulate the placing and use of seats, scenery, curtains, blinds,
screens, or other appliances therein.
